Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,139
Reinstatement following administrative dissolution.

(a) A corporation administratively dissolved under section 21-19,138 may apply to the Secretary of State for reinstatement within five years after the effective date of its administrative dissolution. The application must:

(1) Recite the name of the corporation and the effective date of its administrative dissolution;

(2) State that the ground or grounds for dissolution either did not exist or have been eliminated; and

(3) State that the corporation's name satisfies the requirements of section 21-1931.

(b) If the Secretary of State determines that the application for reinstatement contains the information required by subsection (a) of this section and that the information is correct, the Secretary of State shall cancel the certificate of dissolution and prepare a certificate of reinstatement reciting that determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and serve a copy on the corporation under section 21-1937.

(c) A corporation that has been administratively dissolved under section 21-19,138 for more than five years may apply to the Secretary of State for late reinstatement. The application, along with the fee set forth in section 21-1905, must:

(1) Recite the name of the corporation and the effective date of its administrative dissolution;

(2) State that the ground or grounds for dissolution either did not exist or have been eliminated;

(3) State that the corporation's name satisfies the requirements of section 21-1931;

(4) State that a legitimate reason exists for reinstatement and what such legitimate reason is; and

(5) State that such reinstatement does not constitute fraud on the public.

(d) If the Secretary of State determines that the application for late reinstatement contains the information required by subsection (c) of this section and that the information is correct, the Secretary of State shall cancel the certificate of dissolution and prepare a certificate of late reinstatement reciting that determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and serve a copy on the corporation under section 21-1937.

(e) When reinstatement is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution and the corporation shall resume carrying on its activities as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 139;

Laws 2012, LB854, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB279, § 10.